Idaho statutes. Title 9 EVIDENCE
Chapter 16
FEES AND MILEAGE OF WITNESSES

Sec.

§ 9-1601. Witnesses’ fees in district court.

Witnesses in civil actions in district court or magistrates division thereof, or before any referee, master or commissioner thereof, are entitled to receive such witness fees and travel expenses as determined by the trial court pursuant to the Idaho Rules of Civil Procedure.

§ 9-1602. Witnesses’ fees in probate and justices’ courts. [Repealed.]

§ 9-1603. Interpreters’ fees.

The interpreters are entitled to receive such fee for their services as set and determined by the court together with the same rate per mile as the state of Idaho pays for state employees pursuant to section 67-2008, Idaho Code, to be paid out of the county treasury by order of the court in both civil and criminal actions.

§ 9-1604. Attorneys not entitled to witness’ fees.

No counselor or attorney at law in any case shall be allowed any fees for attendance as a witness in any such cause.

§ 9-1605. State need not prepay fees.

The attorney-general or any prosecuting attorney is authorized to cause subpoenas to be issued, and to compel the attendance of witnesses on behalf of the state, without paying or tendering fees in advance to any witnesses; and any witness failing or neglecting to attend after being served with a subpoena, may be proceeded against and shall be liable in the same manner as provided by law in other cases when fees have been tendered or paid.